Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202481-2126
Request for inspection; when required; fees; failure to file request; procedure.

At or before commencement of any installation required to be inspected by the board, the licensee or owner making such installation shall submit to the board a request for inspection, on a form prescribed by the board, together with a supervisory fee of fifty cents and the inspection fees required for such installation. If the board becomes aware that a person has failed to file a necessary request for inspection, the board shall send to such person a written notification by certified mail to file such request within fourteen days. Any person filing a late request for inspection shall pay a delinquent fee of two hundred fifty dollars. Failure to file such request within fourteen days shall result in submission of the matter to the county attorney's office for action pursuant to section 81-2143.

Laws 1975, LB 525, § 26;

Laws 1978, LB 833, § 11;

R.S.Supp.,1980, § 81-596;

Laws 1982, LB 605, § 3;

Laws 1993, LB 193, § 23;

Laws 2024, LB144, § 12.
July 19, 2024